Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
Poljska/961
Priština/962
Ravni/963
Rasno/964
Resife/965
Rovni/963
Rumunija/966
Sarajevo/967
Skoplje/968
Srbija/969
Srem/970
Stolni/963
Tuzla/971
Turska/972
Uagadugu/973
Fidži/974
Čečenija/966
